Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.100

Conversion procedure—Domestic stock to domestic mutual association.

A domestic stock association may convert to a domestic mutual association under the provisions of applicable statutes and regulations of proper federal and state supervisory authorities. In the event of compliance with such statutes and regulations an appraisal of the stock shall be made by the director, upon written request of the directors of the association, and the appropriate value of the stock may be given consideration in the proceedings to convert by giving credit to such stock from surplus and other reserves.

[ 1994 c 92 s 478; 1982 c 3 s 96; 1955 c 122 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.